Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3409
Signature; witnesses; form.

A transfer on
death deed shall be signed by the transferor or by some person in his or her
presence and by his or her direction and shall be attested in writing by two
or more disinterested witnesses, whose signatures along with the transferor's
signature shall be made before an officer authorized to administer oaths under
the laws of this state or under the laws of the state where execution occurs
and evidenced by the officer's certificate, under official seal, in form and
content substantially as follows:

I, ..........
the transferor, sign my name to this instrument this ..... day of ..... 20
....., and being first duly sworn, do hereby declare to the undersigned authority
that I sign and execute this transfer on death deed to transfer my interest
in the described real property and that I sign it willingly or willingly direct
another to sign for me, that I execute it as my free and voluntary act for
the purposes therein expressed, that I am eighteen years of age or older or
am not at this time a minor, and that I am of sound mind and under no constraint
or undue influence.

Transferor ..............

We, ...... and ......, the witnesses, sign
our names to this instrument, being first duly sworn, and do hereby declare
to the undersigned authority that the transferor signs and executes this transfer
on death deed to transfer his or her interest in the described real property
and that he or she signs it willingly or willingly directs another to sign
for him or her, and that he or she executes it as his or her free and voluntary
act for the purposes therein expressed, and that each of us, in the presence
and hearing of the transferor, hereby signs this deed as witness to the transferor's
signing, and that to the best of his or her knowledge the transferor is eighteen
years of age or older or is not at this time a minor and the transferor is
of sound mind and under no constraint or undue influence.

Witness ..........

Witness ..........

THE STATE OF
....................

COUNTY OF ....................

Subscribed, sworn to, and acknowledged before
me by .........., the transferor, and subscribed and sworn to before me by
.......... and ..........., witnesses, this ..... day of ..... 20..... .

(SEAL)(Signed)
.....................

(Official capacity of officer) ....................

Laws 2012, LB536, § 9.